California statutes. Insurance Code
Before granting a certificate of authority or amended certificate of authority to any applicant, the commissioner shall consider the qualifications of said applicant in respect to the following subjects: (a) capital and surplus; (b) lawfulness and quality of investments; (c) financial stability; (d) reinsurance arrangements; (e) competency, character, and integrity of management; (f) ownership and control of issued and outstanding shares in the case of a capital stock insurer; (g) whether claims under policies are promptly and fairly adjusted and are promptly and fully paid in accordance with law and the terms of policies; (h) fairness and honesty of methods of doing business;
 (i) method by which said applicant was promoted if any of its promoters remain as stockholders or in management; and (j) hazard to policyholders or creditors.

Upon consideration of all relevant qualifications the commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to such applicant, unless the commissioner shall have made a finding, or findings, that the applicant is materially deficient in respect to one or more of the items as outlined in (a) through (j), above.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1044.)
-------------------------------------------

717.1.

Where the applicant is a wholly owned domestic subsidiary of an admitted domestic insurer the commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to such applicant within 180 days of application unless the commissioner shall have made a finding that the applicant is substantially deficient in respect to one or more of the items set forth in Section 717.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

717.2.

(a) On and after January 1, 2007, for purposes of Section 717, the commissioner shall consider, with respect to any application for a certificate of authority or amended certificate of authority to transact health insurance, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 106, in this state, any available evidence regarding any one or more of the following:

(1) Any prior history of providing, or arranging to provide for, health care coverage, services, or benefits in this state and the
 applicant’s history of substantial compliance with applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and requirements.

(2) Any prior history in this state or any other state, of providing, or arranging to provide for, health care coverage, services, or benefits for which the applicant is authorized to receive Medicare Program reimbursement or Medicaid Program reimbursement, and the applicant’s history of substantial compliance with applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and requirements.

(3) Any prior history on the part of the applicant’s management of providing, or arranging to provide for, health services as a licensed health professional or an individual or entity contracting with a health care service plan or insurer, and the applicant’s history of substantial compliance with state requirements, and applicable federal law, regulations, and requirements.

(b) The commissioner may also require the applicant to provide information or documents for the purposes of this section. The commissioner shall consider any other relevant information concerning misconduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 758, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

717.5.

(a) For purposes of Sections 700 and 717, the commissioner may determine that an insurer admitted and domiciled in this state, or an insurer applying to become admitted and domiciled in this state, including an applicant pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 709.5, is qualified to be designated as a professional reinsurer, if the commissioner determines that the insurer is all of the following:

(1) Principally engaged in the business of reinsurance.

(2) Does not conduct significant amounts of direct insurance as percentage of its net premiums.

(3) Is not engaged, on an ongoing basis, in the business of soliciting direct insurance.

(b) The commissioner may consider any information relevant to this determination. An insurer that holds, or is applying for qualification as, a professional reinsurer, shall provide the commissioner with information or documentation regarding the determinations under this section, upon request. The commissioner may prescribe terms and conditions applicable to the certificate of authority, as appropriate under this section.

(c) A domestic, professional reinsurer shall continue to be qualified as long as it continues to meet the requirements set forth in this section.

(d) The commissioner may, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, revoke a reinsurer’s qualification, if the reinsurer no longer qualifies under this section.

(e) A domestic insurer that
 is qualified as a professional reinsurer may include that designation in its name, solicitations, and advertisements.

(f) An insurer seeking qualification under this section shall pay a filing fee of three thousand three hundred twenty-eight dollars ($3,328), in advance, to the commissioner.

(g) The commissioner may adopt regulations in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or otherwise prescribe requirements consistent with this section.

(h) The commissioner may post prescribed requirements, consistent with this section, on the department’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 8.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

718.

If upon due investigation the commissioner shall find that any applicant for a certificate of authority, or amended certificate of authority, will not conduct its business in conformity with all applicable provisions of the laws of this state, he shall not grant any certificate of authority, or amended certificate of authority, to such applicant.

Where the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of or under the management and control of an admitted insurer, or is the successor in interest by merger, consolidation, sale and purchase, or otherwise, of such an admitted insurer, and the applicant is without substantial prior operating
 history, the commissioner may reasonably rely on the known characteristics and reputation of the admitted insurer to the extent relevant and appropriate under the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1044.)
-------------------------------------------

720.

The commissioner may after notice and hearing promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations, and amendments and additions thereto, as are necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes and provisions of this code governing the issuance, suspension and revocation of certificates of authority. Any such rule or regulation shall be promulgated in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1044.)
-------------------------------------------

721.

As used in Sections 704.5, 716, 717 and 718, the term “applicant” includes the attorney-in-fact of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange. Wherever reference therein is made to an officer, director, or management of the applicant, such reference is deemed to include the officers, directors, and management of the attorney-in-fact of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, and the members of the board of governors or other governing committee of the reciprocal itself.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1044.)
-------------------------------------------

725.

Any person otherwise qualified may be a director of two or more insurers, but no such interlocking directorate shall be used as a means of substantially lessening competition in the business of insurance or of creating a monopoly.

Whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that there is a violation of this section, he shall serve upon the insurer or insurers and the director or directors, as the case may be, a notice pursuant to Section 38 of a hearing before the commissioner to be held not less than thirty days after the service of such notice, and requiring such insurer or insurers and such director or directors, as the case may
 be, to show cause why an order should not be made by the commissioner directing such insurer or insurers and such director or directors, as the case may be, to cease and desist from such violation.

If, after a hearing in accordance with the procedure provided in Section 704, the commissioner finds that there has been a violation of this section he shall issue and cause to be served upon such insurer or insurers and such director or directors, as the case may be, an order reciting the facts found by him, and setting forth the respects in which there has been a violation of this section, and directing such insurer or insurers and such director or directors, as the case may be, to cease and desist from such violation.

Any such cease and desist order of the commissioner shall be subject to judicial review. Subject to said judicial review, any person violating any such cease and desist order shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and
 the commissioner may, after a hearing in accordance with the procedure provided in Section 704, decline to grant or renew or may suspend or revoke a certificate of authority of any insurer or insurers violating any such cease and desist order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

726.

The commissioner shall notify the Secretary of State of any refusal to issue a certificate of authority to transact insurance to an applicant therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 737.)
-------------------------------------------

728.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions are applicable:

(1) “Subject person” means any director, officer, or employee or other natural person who participates in the management, direction, or control of an insurer.

(2) “Insurer” means any domestic insurer, and any insurer which is admitted to transact insurance in this state, provided that if a subject person of an insurer is not a resident
 of California, or operating out of a place of business within California, then the subject person shall be engaged in the direct management, direction, or control of the insurer in California in order to come within the provisions of this section.

(b) If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds all of the following, the commissioner may issue an order removing a subject person from his or her office or employment with the insurer and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the insurer, except with the prior consent of the commissioner:

(1) The subject person has engaged in repeated acts of misconduct with respect to the operations of an insurer which have resulted in substantial financial loss to an insurer.

(2) The misconduct which forms
 the pattern is fraudulent, or consists of willful acts or omissions involving personal dishonesty in the acceptance, custody, or payment of money or property on the part of the subject person which has endangered or is likely to endanger the solvency of the insurer.

(3) The pattern of misconduct is relevant in that it demonstrates unfitness to continue as a subject person.

(c) (1) If the commissioner gives written notice pursuant to subdivision (b) to a subject person, the commissioner may immediately issue an order suspending the subject person from his or her office or employment with the insurer and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of an insurer, except with the prior consent of the commissioner if the commissioner: (A) finds that failure to immediately issue such order threatens the
 financial solvency of the insurer or may otherwise cause immediate and irreparable financial injury to the insurer (B) serves that subject person and the insurer with written notice of the suspension order; and (C) finds that all of the necessary factors are present which would permit the commissioner, after notice and a hearing, to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (b) removing a subject person from his or her office or employment with the insurer and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of an insurer.

(2) Any suspension order issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision shall be effective until the date the commissioner dismisses the charges contained in the notice served under subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of this subdivision, the effective date of an order issued by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b), or a court issues a stay of the order pursuant to
 subdivision (d).

(d) Within 10 days after a subject person has been served with an order of suspension pursuant to subdivision (c), the person may apply to the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the insurer is located for a stay of the order pending completion of the proceedings pursuant to subdivision (b), and the court shall have jurisdiction to issue an order staying the suspension. Nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to authorize the court to issue a stay order on an ex parte basis.

(e) (1) If the commissioner finds both of the following, he or she may immediately issue an order suspending a subject person from his or her office or employment with an insurer and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of an insurer, except with the prior consent of the
 commissioner: (A) the subject person has been charged in an indictment issued by a grand jury, or in an information, complaint, or similar pleading issued by a United States Attorney, district attorney, or other governmental official or agency authorized to prosecute crimes, with a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year and which involves as one of its necessary elements a fraudulent act or an act of dishonesty in the acceptance, custody, or payment of money or property; and (B) that a failure to immediately issue the order threatens the financial solvency of the insurer, or may otherwise cause immediate and irreparable financial injury to the insurer.

In the event the criminal proceedings are terminated other than by judgment of conviction, an order issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision shall be deemed rescinded as if it had not been issued.

(2) If the
 commissioner finds both of the following, he or she may immediately issue an order removing a subject person from his or her office or employment with an insurer and prohibiting the subject person from further participating in any manner in the conduct of the business of the insurer, except with the prior consent of the commissioner: (A) the person has been convicted during the preceding five years of a crime that is punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year and that has as one of its necessary elements a fraudulent act or an act of dishonesty in the accepting, custody, or payment of money or property; and (B) that a failure to immediately issue the order threatens the financial solvency of the insurer, or may otherwise cause immediate and irreparable financial injury to the insurer.

(3) The fact that any subject person charged with a crime involving as one of its necessary elements a fraudulent act or any act of dishonesty in
 the acceptance, custody, or payment of money or property is not convicted of that crime shall not preclude the commissioner from issuing an order regarding the subject person pursuant to other provisions of this code.

(f) (1) Within 30 days after an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (c) or (e), the person to whom the order is issued may choose to do either of the following: (A) file with the commissioner an application for a hearing on the order. The commissioner shall, upon written request of the person, extend the 30-day period by an additional 30 days provided the request is filed with the commissioner within 30 days after the order is issued. If the commissioner fails to commence the hearing within 15 business days after the application is filed, or within a longer period of time to which the person consents, the order shall be deemed rescinded as if it had not been issued. Within 30 days after the hearing, the
 commissioner shall affirm, modify, or rescind the order; otherwise, the order shall be deemed rescinded as if it had not been issued, or (B) petition for judicial review of the order pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure, where the court shall exercise its independent judgment on the evidence.

(2) The right of any person to whom an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (c) or (e) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of that person to apply to the commissioner for a hearing on the order as provided by this subdivision.

(g) (1) Any person to whom an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (e) may apply to the commissioner to modify or rescind the order. The commissioner shall not grant the application unless he or she finds that it is reasonable to believe that the person will, if and
 when he or she becomes a subject person, comply with all of the applicable provisions of this code and of any regulation or order issued thereunder.

(2) The right of any person to whom an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (e) to petition for judicial review of the order shall not be affected by the failure of that person to apply to the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (1).

(h) (1) It is unlawful for any subject person or former subject person to whom an order is issued pursuant to subdivision (b), (c) or (e) to do any of the following as long as the order is effective, except with the prior consent of the commissioner: (A) to serve or act as a subject person for or in any insurer; or (B) to directly or indirectly solicit, procure, or transfer or attempt to transfer or vote any proxy, consent or authorization with respect to any shares or
 other securities of any insurer having voting rights.

(2) If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds that any person has violated paragraph (1) of this subdivision, the commissioner may order that person to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty in an amount the commissioner may specify; provided however, that the amount of the civil penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation or, in the case of a continuing violation, one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day for which the violation continues, which may be recovered in a civil action.

In determining the amount of civil penalty to be paid to the commissioner under this paragraph, the commissioner shall consider the financial resources and good faith of the person charged, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations by the person, and such other factors as in the opinion of the
 commissioner may be relevant.

(3) If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds that any insurer has knowingly aided and abetted a subject person in a violation of paragraph (1) of this subdivision, the commissioner may order that insurer to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty in an amount the commissioner may specify; provided however, that the amount of the civil penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation, or in the case of a continuing violation, ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day for which the violation continues up to a maximum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), which may be recovered in a civil action. Continuation of the subject person’s salary or other employee benefits pending final disposition shall not be considered aiding and abetting a subject person.

In determining the amount of civil penalty to be paid to the commissioner
 under this paragraph, the commissioner shall consider the financial resources and good faith of the person charged, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations by the person, and such other factors as in the opinion of the commissioner may be relevant.

(i) Except as otherwise provided by this section any hearing required by this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, subject to the following:

(1) At the option of the subject person, all such hearings shall be a closed session and private, and the records of the hearings shall not be made public unless the hearing results in a final order adverse to the subject person.

(2) Where judicial review is sought by the subject person pursuant to
 Section 11523 of the Government Code, the court shall exercise its independent judgment upon the evidence.

(3) When a subject person to whom an order has been issued pursuant to subdivision (c) or (e) applies to the commissioner for a hearing pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), the Office of Administrative Hearings shall schedule the hearing on a priority basis at the earliest possible time and once the hearing is commenced, it shall not be continued for more than three business days without the consent of the subject person.

(4) If the Office of Administrative Hearings cannot schedule the commencement of a hearing within 15 business days as provided by paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), and the subject person does not waive his or her right to a hearing commencing within 15 days, the hearings may be conducted by administrative law judges appointed by
 the commissioner. In the event the subject person chooses to accept a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the commissioner, the hearing shall be completed within 45 days of commencement unless additional time is requested by the subject person. If the hearing is not completed within 45 days, the order shall be deemed rescinded as if it had not been issued.

(j) Nothing in this section is intended to or shall be construed to create a private cause of action against an offending subject person or an insurer or production agency that aids and abets a subject person, based on the standards established by this section or the commissioner’s findings or orders pursuant to this section.

(k) Notwithstanding this section, or any other authority of the commissioner, the commissioner shall not have the power to remove or replace either the Board of Directors or the
 President of the State Compensation Insurance Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Examination by Commissioner [729. - 738.]

729.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Company” means any person engaging in, or proposing or attempting to engage in, any transaction or kind of insurance or surety business and any person or group of persons who may otherwise be subject to the administrative, regulatory, or taxing authority of the commissioner.

(b) “Examiner” means any individual or firm authorized by the commissioner to conduct an examination under this article.

(c) “Person” means any person, association, organization, business trust, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, or any affiliate thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

730.

(a) The commissioner, whenever he or she deems necessary or whenever he or she is requested by verified petition, signed by 25 persons interested as shareholders, policyholders, or creditors of any admitted insurer showing that the insurer is insolvent under this code, or upon information that any insurer has violated any provision of Article 7 (commencing with Section 800), shall examine the business and affairs of the insurer. The commissioner shall so examine every domestic insurer before issuing to it a certificate of authority other than a renewal.

(b) The commissioner may conduct an examination under this article of any company as often as the commissioner in his or her discretion deems appropriate but shall, at a minimum, conduct an examination of every insurer
 admitted in this state not less frequently than once every five years. In scheduling and determining the nature, scope, and frequency of the examinations, the commissioner shall consider the results of financial statement analyses and ratios, changes in management or ownership, actuarial opinions, reports of independent certified public accountants, market analysis results, including consumer complaint analysis, evaluation of ongoing regulatory activities, analysis of data derived from industry surveys or interrogatories, and other criteria as set forth in the Examiner’s Handbook or in the Market Regulation Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners that are in effect when the commissioner exercises discretion under this section.

(c) For purposes of completing an examination of any company under this article, the commissioner may examine or investigate any person, or the business of any person, insofar as the
 examination or investigation is, in the discretion of the commissioner, necessary or material to the examination of the company.

(d) In lieu of an examination under this article of any foreign or alien insurer admitted in this state, the commissioner may accept an examination report on the company as prepared by the insurance department of the company’s state of domicile or port-of-entry state until January 1, 1994. Thereafter, these reports may only be accepted if (1) the insurance department was at the time of the examination accredited under the National Association of Insurance Commissioner’s Financial Regulation Standards and Accreditation Program, or (2) the examination is performed under the supervision of an accredited insurance department or with the participation of one or more examiners who are employed by an accredited state insurance department and who, after a review of the examination work papers and report, state under oath that
 the examination was performed in a manner consistent with the standards and procedures required by their insurance department.

(e) The commissioner may postpone a market conduct examination otherwise required by this article for a period of up to three years if information derived from a market analysis indicates all of the following:

(1) The prior examination of the insurer resulted in no significant negative findings.

(2) The number of consumer complaints received by the insurer is in the lowest quartile of complaints, on a ratio basis, for insurers in that line of business.

(3) The market analysis identifies no other issues of significant concern.

(f) An admitted insurer shall maintain
 all records necessary to determine its financial condition for the current year plus the five previous years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 8.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

731.

Whenever any foreign insurer applies for admission the commissioner may make, or cause to be made by the insurance authority of the State where the insurer is organized, an examination of its insurance business and affairs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

An insurer organized or existing under the laws of any country outside of the United States shall be deemed to be organized, within the meaning of this article, in any State wherein such insurer maintains the deposits to protect policyholders as required by this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

In making such examination the commissioner:

(a) Shall have free access to all the books and papers of the company.

(b) Shall thoroughly inspect and examine all its affairs.

(c) Shall ascertain its condition and ability to fulfill its obligations.

(d) Shall ascertain if it has complied with all laws applicable to its insurance transactions.

(e) May appraise or cause to be appraised by competent appraisers appointed by him or her all property in which the insurer has or claims an interest, or which is security, in any form, for the payment of any debt or obligation to the insurer. All such appraisals of real property shall be in writing.

(f) Shall, in conducting the examination, observe those guidelines and procedures set forth in the Examiner’s Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. The commissioner may also employ other guidelines or procedures which the commissioner may deem appropriate.

(g) May retain attorneys, appraisers, independent actuaries, independent certified public accountants, or other professionals and specialists as examiners, or any of the employees of the department assigned by the commissioner to carry out the purposes of this article, the cost of which shall be borne by the company subject to examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 1.2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

734.

Every company or person from whom information is sought, and its officers, directors, employees, and agents, shall provide to the examiners appointed pursuant to this article, timely, convenient, and free access at all reasonable hours at its offices to all books, records, accounts, papers, documents, and any or all computer or other recordings relating to the property, assets, business, and affairs of the company being examined. The officers, directors, employees, and agents of the company or person shall assist the examiners and aid in the examination so far as it is in their power to do so. The commissioner shall have the power to issue subpoenas, to administer oaths, and to examine under oath any person as to any matter pertinent to the examination. If he or she finds the books to be carelessly or improperly kept or posted, he or she shall employ sworn experts to rewrite, post, and balance the books at the insurer’s expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 1.3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

734.1.

(a) No later than 60 days following completion of the examination, the examiner in charge shall file with the department a verified written report of the examination under oath. Upon receipt of the verified report, the department shall transmit the report to the company examined, together with a notice that the company has 30 days to make a written submission or rebuttal with respect to any matters contained in the examination report.

(b) Within 30 days of the end of the period allowed for the receipt of written submissions or rebuttals, the commissioner shall fully consider and review the report, together with any written submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the examiner’s workpapers, and shall either adopt the report as filed or with modifications or corrections, or reject the report with directions to the examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of obtaining additional data, documentation, or information, and refiling pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to limit the commissioner’s authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue other legal or regulatory action pursuant to the insurance laws of this state.

(2) If the commissioner terminates or suspends an examination that includes an examination of claims practices, the commissioner shall within 10 days of the termination or suspension transmit a copy of the complete examination file to the State Bureau of Audits. The State Auditor shall audit the file pursuant to Section 10527 of the Government Code to determine the propriety of the termination or suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 997, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

735.

The hereinafter designated officer of each domestic insurer shall inform the members present at the next meeting of its governing body of the receipt from the office of the commissioner of the report of every examination of such insurer, both in the form first formally prepared by the examiners and in the form as finally settled and officially filed by the commissioner or a deputy designated by him. Such officer shall also inform such members that a copy of such report is available for inspection of any member of such governing body. There shall be entered in the minutes of each such meeting the fact that such officer did so inform the members present.

The officer above referred to, in the case of a stock or mutual insurer, shall be its secretary or comparable officer if there is no secretary. This section shall specifically apply to reciprocals and interinsurance exchanges and in that case the officer above referred to shall be the principal individual, partner or officer of its attorney-in-fact, and “governing body” shall have reference to the body exercising the subscribers’ rights provided for in Section 1308.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective February 12, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

735.5.

(a) Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to limit the commissioner’s authority to use and, if appropriate, to make public, any final or preliminary examination report, any examiner or company workpapers or other documents, or any other information discovered or developed during the course of any examination in the furtherance of any legal or regulatory action which the commissioner may, in his or her discretion, deem appropriate.

(b) Nothing contained in this code shall prevent or be construed as prohibiting the commissioner from disclosing the content of an examination report, preliminary examination report or results, market analysis data, or any matter relating thereto, to the insurance department of this
 or any other state or country, or to law enforcement officials of this or any other state or agency of the federal government at any time, or to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, provided the recipient of the report or matters relating thereto agrees in writing to hold it confidential and in a manner consistent with this article, unless the prior written consent of the company to which it pertains has been obtained.

(c) All working papers, recorded information, documents, and copies thereof produced by, obtained by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in the course of an examination made pursuant to this article shall be given confidential treatment and are not subject to subpoena and shall not be made public by the commissioner or any other person, except to the extent provided in subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 234, Sec. 3.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

736.

All examinations and analyses performed pursuant to Section 730 shall be at the expense of the insurer, organization, or person examined, except that special examinations which are in addition to regular examinations may be at the expense of the state in the discretion of the commissioner. The costs and expenses of all of those examinations shall be paid from the support appropriation for the Department of Insurance current at the time of the examination but shall be charged to and collected from the insurer, organization or person examined. If any insurer, organization, or person refuses to pay those costs and expenses promptly when due, the commissioner may refuse to issue its certificate of authority, certificate of exemption, or license, as the case may be, and may revoke any existing certificate of
 authority, certificate of exemption, or license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 234, Sec. 4.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

737.

(a) No cause of action shall arise nor shall any liability be imposed against the commissioner, the commissioner’s authorized representatives, or any examiner appointed by the commissioner for any statements made or conduct performed in good faith while carrying out the provisions of this article.

(b) No cause of action shall arise, nor shall any liability be imposed against any person for the act of communicating or delivering information or data to the commissioner or the commissioner’s authorized representative or examiner pursuant to an examination made under this article, if the act of communication or delivery was performed in good faith and without fraudulent intent or the intent to deceive.

(c) This section shall not abrogate or modify in any way any common law or statutory privilege or immunity previously enjoyed by any person identified in subdivision (a).

(d) A person identified in subdivision (a) shall be entitled to an award of attorney’s fees and costs if he or she is the prevailing party in a civil cause of action for libel, slander, or any other relevant tort arising out of activities engaged in while carrying out the provisions of this article and the party bringing the action was not substantially justified in doing so. For purposes of this section, a proceeding is substantially justified if it had a reasonable basis in law or fact at the time that it was initiated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 614, Sec. 1.6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

738.

The commissioner shall have the same powers and authority to examine the State Compensation Insurance Fund as are conferred upon him by law relative to the examination of other insurers except where the fund is specifically exempted by reference.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.1. Risk-Based Capital for Insurers [739. - 739.12.]

739.

As used in this article, these terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Adjusted RBC Report” means a Risk-Based Capital (RBC) report that has been adjusted by the commissioner in accordance with subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 739.2.

(b) “Corrective Order” means an order issued by the commissioner specifying corrective actions that the commissioner has determined are required.

(c) “Domestic insurer” means any life or health insurer or property and casualty insurer organized in this state.

(d) “Foreign insurer” means any life or health insurer or property and casualty insurer that is licensed to do business in this state but is not domiciled in this state.

(e) “Life or health insurer” means any admitted insurer issuing insurance subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10110) of Division 2, or a licensed property and casualty insurer writing only disability insurance.

(f) “NAIC” means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(g) “Negative trend” means, with respect to a life or health insurer, a negative trend over a period of time, as determined in accordance with the “Trend Test Calculation” included in the RBC Instructions defined in subdivision (i).

(h) “Property and casualty insurer” means any admitted insurer writing insurance as described in Section 102, 103, 105, 107, 108,
 109, 110, 111, 112, 113, 114, 115, 116, 118, 119.5, 119.6, or 120, but does not include monoline mortgage guaranty insurers, financial guaranty insurers, or title insurers.
